Maryland, session 2026, SB0393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
16–320.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Community college” includes Baltimore City Community College.
(3) “Eligible project” means a facility renewal project, including
improvements, repairs, and deferred maintenance, that [has a total estimated cost of not
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0393*

SENATE BILL 393
more than $1,000,000 and] has been submitted to the Commission as part of an annual
master plan or a 10–year master plan.
(4) “Program” means the Community College Facilities Renewal Grant
Program.
(b) (1) There is a Community College Facilities Renewal Grant Program that
shall provide State funds to community colleges for improvements, repairs, and deferred
maintenance projects in accordance with this section.
(2) The Commission shall administer the Program.
(c) (1) (i) In fiscal years 2019 through 2021, the Governor shall annually
appropriate in the operating budget of the Commission an amount equal to 5% of the
appropriation to the Community College Construction Grant Program in the same fiscal
year.
(ii) [In] FOR THE PROGRAM, IN fiscal year 2022 and each fiscal
year thereafter, the Governor shall annually appropriate in the operating or capital budget
of the Commission an amount equal to 5% of the appropriation to the Community College
Construction Grant Program in the same fiscal year.
(2) The appropriation required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
be in addition to and may not supplant the amount appropriated to the Community College
Construction Grant Program in the State budget.
(3) FOR THE PROGRAM, IN EACH FISCAL YEAR, IF THE AMOUNT THE
GOVERNOR APPROPRIATES TO THE COMMUNITY COLLEGE CONSTRUCTION GRANT
PROGRAM IS LESS THAN $80,000,000, THEN THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPROPRIATE
IN THE OPERATING OR CAPITAL BUDGET OF THE COMMISSION AN AMOUNT EQUAL
TO THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN $80,000,000 AND THE AMOUNT APPROPRIATED TO
THE COMMUNITY COLLEGE CAPITAL GRANT PROGRAM IN THAT FISCAL YEAR.
(d) (1) On or before September 1 of the fiscal year preceding the fiscal year of
the grant award, a community college shall provide to the Commission information about
the eligible project for which the community college is requesting a grant.
(2) (i) The Commission may make up to [eight] 16 grants in each fiscal
year.
(ii) [1. Subject to subsubparagraph 2 of this subparagraph, a
community college may not receive a grant in 2 consecutive fiscal years.
2. If a community college does not request funds in a fiscal
year, the community college may not receive a grant until the second following fiscal year.

SENATE BILL 393 3
(iii) 1. Subject to subsubparagraph 2 of this subparagraph, a
community college may not receive more than $500,000 in a fiscal year under the Program.
2. If the appropriation provided under subsection (c) of this
section is less than $4,000,000 in a fiscal year, the] THE appropriation shall be awarded
equally to each community college that is eligible for a grant in [that] EACH fiscal year.
[3. Subject to the limitation established in subsubparagraph
1 of this subparagraph, a community college may receive funding for more than one eligible
project in a fiscal year.]
[(iv)] (III) The Commission shall consult with each community
college to determine which community colleges will receive a grant for eligible projects
under the Program in each fiscal year.
(e) The Commission, in collaboration with the community colleges, shall adopt
any regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.